nb: Medisinsk tapemateriale: Bomull; Hydrogel; Lateks; Plast; Polyamid (PA); Polyester; Polyuretan (PU); Silikon; Syntetisk; Viskose; Annet
fi: Lääketieteellinen teippimateriaali: Puuvilla; Hydrogeeli; Lateksi; Muovi; Polyamidi (PA); Polyesteri; Polyuretaani (PU); Silikoni; Synteettinen; Viskoosi; Muu
pl: Materiał taśmy medycznej: Bawełna; Hydrożel; Lateks; Tworzywo sztuczne; Poliamid (PA); Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Silikon; Syntetyczne; Wiskoza; Inne
bg-BG: Материал за медицинска лента: Памук; Хидрогел; Латекс; Пластмаса; Полиамид (PA); Полиестер; Полиуретан (PU); Силикон; Синтетичен; Вискоза; Други
hr-HR: Materijal trake za medicinske potrebe: Pamuk; Hidrogel; Lateks; Plastika; Poliamid (PA); Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Silikon; Sintetika; Viskoza; Ostalo
hu: Orvosi ragasztószalag anyaga: Pamut; Hidrogél; Latex; Műanyag; Poliamid (PA); Poliészter; Poliuretán (PU); Szilikon; Szintetikus; Viszkóz; Egyéb
zh-TW: 醫用膠帶材質: 棉布; 水凝膠; 乳膠; 塑膠; 聚醯胺 (PA); 聚酯; 聚氨酯 (PU); 矽膠; 合成; 黏膠; 其他
it: Materiale del nastro medico: Cotone; Idrogel; Lattice; Plastica; Poliammide (PA); Poliestere; Poliuretano (PU); Silicone; Sintetico; Viscosa; Altro
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำเทปกาวทางการแพทย์: สำลี; ไฮโดรเจล; ยางพารา; พลาสติก; โพลิอะไมด์ (PA); โพลีเอสเตอร์; โพลิยูรีเทน (PU); ซิลิโคน; สังเคราะห์; เส้นใยเรยอน; อื่นๆ
el: Υλικό ιατρικής ταινίας: Βαμβάκι; Υδρογέλη; Λάτεξ; Πλαστικό; Πολυαμίδιο (PA); Πολυεστέρας; Πολυουρεθάνη (PU); Σιλικόνη; Συνθετικό; Βισκόζη; Άλλο
pt-BR: Material de fita médica: Algodão; Hidrogel; Látex; Plástico; Poliamida (PA); Poliéster; Poliuretano (PU); Silicone; Sintético; Viscose; Outro
en: Medical tape material: Cotton; Hydrogel; Latex; Plastic; Polyamide (PA); Polyester; Polyurethane (PU); Silicone; Synthetic; Viscose; Other
sk-SK: Materiál zdravotníckej pásky: Bavlna; Hydrogél; Latex; Plast; Polyamid (PA); Polyester; Polyuretán (PU); Silikón; Syntetika; Viskóza; Iné
de: Medizinisches Klebebandmaterial: Baumwolle; Hydrogel; Latex; Kunststoff; Polyamid (PA); Polyester; Polyurethan (PU); Silikon; Synthetisch; Viskose; Sonstiges
da: Materiale for medicinsk tape: Bomuld; Hydrogel; Latex; Plast; Polyamid (PA); Polyester; Polyurethan (PU); Silikone; Syntetisk; Viskose; Andet
nl: Materiaal medisch tape: Katoen; Hydrogel; Latex; Plastic; Polyamide (PA); Polyester; Polyurethaan (PU); Siliconen; Synthetisch; Viscose; Andere
vi: Vật liệu băng y tế: Vải bông; Hydrogel; Mủ cao su; Nhựa; Polyamide (PA); Polyester; Polyurethane (PU); Silicon; Tổng hợp; Vải viscose; Khác
pt-PT: Material de fita médica: Algodão; Hidrogel; Látex; Plástico; Poliamida (PA); Poliéster; Poliuretano (PU); Silicone; Sintético; Viscose; Outro
ru: Материал медицинской ленты: Вата; Гидрогель; Латекс; Пластик; Полиамид (ПА); Полиэстер; Полиуретан (ПУ); Силикон; Синтетика; Вискоза; Другое
es: Material de la cinta médica: Algodón; Hidrogel; Látex; Plástico; Poliamida (PA); Poliéster; Poliuretano (PU); Silicona; Sintético; Viscosa; Otros
zh-CN: 医用胶带材质: 棉布; 水凝胶; 乳胶; 塑料; 聚酰胺 (PA); 聚酯纤维; 聚氨酯 (PU); 硅胶; 合成; 纤维胶; 其他
ro-RO: Material leucoplast: Bumbac; Hidrogel; Latex; Plastic; Poliamidă (PA); Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Silicon; Sintetic; Viscoză; Altele
ja: 医療用テープ素材: コットン; ハイドロゲル; ラテックス; プラスチック; ポリアミド (PA); ポリエステル; ポリウレタン (PU); シリコーン; 合成品; ビスコース; その他
fr: Matériau du ruban médical: Coton; Hydrogel; Latex; Plastique; Polyamide (PA); Polyester; Polyuréthane (PU); Silicone; Synthétique; Viscose; Autre
tr: Tıbbi Bant malzemesi: Pamuk; Hidrojel; Lateks; Plastik; Poliamid (PA); Poliyester; Poliüretan (PU); Silikon; Sentetik; Viskon; Diğer
ko: 의료용 테이프 소재: 면; 하이드로겔; 라텍스; 플라스틱; 폴리아미드(PA); 폴리에스테르; 폴리우레탄(PU); 실리콘; 인조; 비스코스; 기타
lt-LT: Medicininės lipnios juostos medžiaga: Medvilnė; Hidrogelis; Lateksas; Plastikas; Poliamidas (PA); Poliesteris; Poliuretanas (PU); Silikonas; Sintetika; Viskozė; Kita
sv: Medicinsk tejp - material: Bomull; Hydrogel; Latex; Plast; Polyamid (PA); Polyester; Polyuretan (PU); Silikon; Syntetisk; Viskos; Övrigt
sl-SI: Material za medicinski trak: Bombaž; Hidrogel; Latex; Plastika; Poliamid (PA); Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Silikon; Sintetika; Viskoza; Drugo
cs: Materiál lékařské pásky: Bavlna; Hydrogel; Latex; Plast; Polyamid (PA); Polyester; Polyuretan (PU); Silikon; Syntetické; Viskóza; Jiné